District of Columbia statutes.
9-1111.10

Appropriation for Arlington Cemetery and Smithsonian transit stations.

(a)

The Secretary of Transportation shall make payments to the Transit Authority in such amounts as may be requisitioned from time to time by the Transit Authority sufficient, in the aggregate, to finance the cost of designing, constructing, and equipping: (1) a rail rapid transit station partially under Memorial Drive designed to serve the Arlington Cemetery with 2 entrances surfacing adjacent to the sidewalks north and south of Memorial Drive and east of Jefferson Davis Highway; and (2) an additional entrance in the vicinity of the northeast end of the Smithsonian Station surfacing on the Mall south of Adams Drive; except that the aggregate amount of such payments shall not exceed $7,385,000.

(b)

There is authorized to be appropriated to the Secretary of Transportation, without fiscal year limitation, an amount not to exceed $7,385,000 to carry out the purposes of this section. The appropriations authorized in this subsection shall not be subject to the provisions of this subchapter requiring contributions by the local governments and shall be in addition to the appropriations authorized by § 9-1111.02(c).

Dec. 9, 1969, Pub. L. 91-143, § 13
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1004, Pub. L. 92-517, title VI, § 601
1981 Ed., § 1-2462.
1973 Ed., § 1-1450.